Utah statutes.
32A-4-202.   Application and renewal requirements.
(1)  A person seeking an airport lounge liquor license under this part shall
file a written application with the department, in a form prescribed by the
department, accompanied by:
(a)  a nonrefundable $250 application fee;
(b)  an initial license fee of $7,000, which is refundable if a license is not
granted;
(c)  written consent of the local and airport authority;
(d)  a copy of the applicant's current business license;
(e)  a bond as specified by Section 32A-4-205;
(f)  a floor plan of the airport lounge, including consumption areas and the
area where the applicant proposes to keep, store, and sell liquor;
(g)  a copy of the sign proposed to be used by the licensee on its premises to
inform the public that alcoholic beverages are sold and consumed there;
(h)  evidence that the airport lounge is carrying public liability insurance
in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;
(i)  evidence that the airport lounge is carrying dramshop insurance coverage
of at least $1,000,000 per occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate;
(j)  a signed consent form stating that the airport lounge will permit any
authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law
enforcement officer unrestricted right to enter the airport lounge;
(k)  in the case of an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or
limited liability company, proper verification evidencing that the person or
persons signing the airport lounge application are authorized to so act on
behalf of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; and
(l)  any other information the commission or department may require.
(2) (a) An airport lounge liquor license expires on October 31 of each year.
(b)  A person desiring to renew that person's airport lounge liquor license
shall submit a renewal fee of $5,000 and a completed renewal application to
the department no later than September 30.
(c)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements shall result in an automatic
forfeiture of the license, effective on the date the existing license expires.
(d)  Renewal applications shall be in a form as prescribed by the department.
(3)  To ensure compliance with Subsection 32A-4-206(21), the commission may
revoke an airport lounge liquor license if the airport liquor licensee does
not immediately notify the department of any change in:
(a)  ownership of the licensee;
(b)  for a corporate owner, the:
(i)  corporate officers or directors; or
(ii)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of the corporation; or
(c)  for a limited liability company:
(i)  managers; or
(ii)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.
